Florida, session 2026, HB235.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Creating a
Respectful and Open World for Natural Hair Act" or "CROWN Act."
Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 1000.05, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1000.05 Discrimination against students and employees in
the Florida K-20 public education system prohibited; equality of
access required.—
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb235-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 235 2026
(2)(a) As used in this section, the term "protected
hairstyle" means hair characteristics historically associated
with race, such as hair texture and styles, including, but not
limited to, afros, braids, locks, or twists.
(b) Discrimination on the basis of race, color, national
origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a
student or an employee in the state system of public K-20
education is prohibited. No person in this state shall, on the
basis of race, color, national origin, sex, disability,
religion, or marital status, be excluded from participation in,
be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination
under any public K-20 education program or activity, or in any
employment conditions or practices, conducted by a public
educational institution that receives or benefits from federal
or state financial assistance. Additionally, discrimination
based on a protected hairstyle against a student in the state
system of public K-20 education is prohibited. A student may not
be excluded from participation in, denied the benefits of, or
subjected to discrimination under any public K-20 education
program or activity on the basis of a protected hairstyle.
(c)(b) The criteria for admission to a program or course
may shall not have the effect of restricting access by students
persons of a particular race, color, national origin, sex,
disability, religion, or marital status or with a protected
hairstyle.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb235-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 235 2026
(d)(c) All public K-20 education classes must shall be
available to all students without regard to race, color,
protected hairstyle, national origin, sex, disability, religion,
or marital status; however, this is not intended to eliminate
the provision of programs designed to meet the needs of students
with limited proficiency in English, gifted students, or
students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with
specialized talents or skills.
(e)(d) Students may be separated by sex for a single-
gender program, for any portion of a class that deals with human
reproduction, or during participation in bodily contact sports.
For the purpose of this section, bodily contact sports include
wrestling, boxing, rugby, ice hockey, football, basketball, and
other sports in which the purpose or major activity involves
bodily contact.
(f)(e) Guidance services, counseling services, and
financial assistance services in the state public K-20 education
system shall be available to students equally. Guidance and
counseling services, materials, and promotional events shall
stress access to academic and career opportunities for students
without regard to race, color, protected hairstyle, national
origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
Section 3. Subsection (7) of section 1002.20, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.20 K-12 student and parent rights.—Parents of public
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb235-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 235 2026
school students must receive accurate and timely information
regarding their child's academic progress and must be informed
of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12
students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory
rights including, but not limited to, the following:
(7) NONDISCRIMINATION.—All education programs, activities,
and opportunities offered by public educational institutions
must be made available without discrimination on the basis of
race, ethnicity, national origin, gender, disability, religion,
or marital status, in accordance with the provisions of s.
1000.05. For purposes of this subsection, the term "race" is
inclusive of traits historically associated with race,
including, but not limited to, hair texture, hair type, and
protected hairstyles. The term "protected hairstyle" includes,
but is not limited to, afros, braids, locks, or twists.
Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1002.421, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.421 State school choice scholarship program
accountability and oversight.—
(1) PRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.—A private
school participating in an educational scholarship program
established pursuant to this chapter must be a private school as
defined in s. 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in
compliance with all requirements of this section in addition to
100 private school requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb235-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 235 2026
101 requirements identified within respective scholarship program
102 laws, and other provisions of Florida law that apply to private
103 schools, and must:
104 (a) Comply with the antidiscrimination provisions of 42
105 U.S.C. s. 2000d. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "race"
106 as used in 42 U.S.C. s. 2000d is inclusive of traits
107 historically associated with race, including, but not limited
108 to, hair texture, hair type, and protected hairstyles. The term
109 "protected hairstyle" includes, but is not limited to, afros,
110 braids, locks, or twists.
111
112 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private
113 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection, and
114 shall prohibit the school from enrolling new scholarship
115 students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school complies. If a
116 private school fails to meet the requirements of this subsection
117 or has consecutive years of material exceptions listed in the
118 report required under paragraph (q), the commissioner may
119 determine that the private school is ineligible to participate
120 in a scholarship program.
121 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb235-00